Florida, session 2026, SB1472.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 8 9 Section 1.âParagraph (q) of subsection (2) of section 10 1003.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 11 1003.42âRequired instruction.â 12 (2)âMembers of the instructional staff of the public 13 schools, subject to the rules of the State Board of Education 14 and the district school board, shall teach efficiently and 15 faithfully, using the books and materials required that meet the 16 highest standards for professionalism and historical accuracy, 17 following the prescribed courses of study, and employing 18 approved methods of instruction, the following: 19 (q)âThe study of Hispanic contributions to the United 20 States. Such instruction must include: 21 1.âFor grades K through 2, Hispanic American holidays, 22 symbols, and traditions; Hispanic Americans who have made 23 significant contributions to the country; how Hispanic Americans 24 fit into the broader American social fabric; and the importance 25 of respect, fairness, and kindness to all people. 26 2.âFor grades 3 through 5, Spanish exploration of the New 27 World; the role of Hispanic leaders in the defense of the United 28 States; influences of Hispanic culture in American life; 29 Hispanic Americans who have excelled in the arts and sciences, 30 business, and education; Hispanic Americans who have 31 demonstrated perseverance, courage, and civic responsibility; 32 and how fairness, hard work, and equality strengthen democracy. 33 3.âFor grades 6 through 8, the impact of Spanish 34 colonization and Hispanic communities on the growth of the 35 United States; how United States expansion affected Hispanic 36 populations; Hispanic contributions during significant periods 37 of United States history; how Hispanic Americans overcame 38 barriers to achieve equality and opportunity; how Hispanic 39 American experiences reflect the nationâs founding principles of 40 liberty and equality; how prejudice, racism, and stereotyping 41 limit individual freedoms; and how recognition of freedoms helps 42 overturn unjust laws. 43 4.âFor grades 9 through 12, the role of Hispanic people in 44 United States exploration, colonization, and expansion; Hispanic 45 American participation in major United States conflicts; 46 Hispanic American contributions to United States economic 47 growth; the influence of Hispanic leaders in advancing civil 48 rights; Hispanic American contributions to art, music, 49 literature, science, and education; how Hispanic identity has 50 evolved within American society; how hard work, merit, and 51 responsibility align with the pursuit of happiness and success; 52 instances where Hispanic Americansâ freedoms were infringed upon 53 and how those injustices were addressed; Hispanic American 54 contributions to civic life and governance; and stories of 55 Hispanic Americans who prospered through perseverance and 56 innovation. 57 58 The State Board of Education is encouraged to adopt standards 59 and pursue assessment of the requirements of this subsection. 60 Instructional programming that incorporates the values of the 61 recipients of the Congressional Medal of Honor and that is 62 offered as part of a social studies, English Language Arts, or 63 other schoolwide character building and veteran awareness 64 initiative meets the requirements of paragraph (u). 65 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.